Washington statutes.
RCW 15.76.165

Authorization for capital funding to support capital projects that make health or safety improvements to agricultural fairgrounds or fair facilities—Contract requirements.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department may provide capital funding to local governments and nonprofit organizations, on a competitive basis, to support capital projects that make health or safety improvements to agricultural fairgrounds or fair facilities in order to benefit participants and the fair-going public.

(2) The department shall develop and manage appropriate contracts with the selected applicants, monitor project expenditures and grantee performance, report project and contract information, and exercise due diligence and other contract management responsibilities.

(a) The department shall include provisions in the contracts which require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities must be used for the express purpose of the grant.

(b) If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

[ 2012 c 221 s 3; 2005 c 443 s 2; 1973 c 117 s 1; 1969 c 85 s 1.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2005 c 443: See notes following RCW 82.08.0255.